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LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC C 1555 / 55 Predriver Malfuncion

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
When the VGRS ECU detects a malfunction in the predriver, it turns the warning light on and records the
DTC at the same time, and then stops VGRS operation.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1555/55
Even when the estimated value of the motor power source
current isat least10A, thesystemdetects that theactualmo-
tor power source current is less than 3 A for 0.1 sec.

SPowersourcecircuit
SVGRSECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
After the procedure, perform the counter clearance (See page DI−363).

1 Check for an open or short circuit in the harness and connector between termi-
nal PGND of VGRS ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch OFF.
CHECK:
Check continuity between terminal PGND of VGRS ECU and
body ground.
OK:

Less than 1 �

NG Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK

2 Check output of DTC C1522/22.

CHECK:
Turn the ignition switch ON and check the DTC (See page DI−348).
OK:

DTCC 1522/22 ispresent

OKFlowofDTCC 1522/22.

NG

Replace VGRS ECU.


